Louisiana, session 2026, SB312.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:438(E) and (F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§438. Permitted withholdings; exceptions
* * *
E.(1) Upon the submission of an electronic request to the employer, the
employee shall have the right to immediately cease any withholding of dues or
fees from his wages. Upon receipt of a request from the employee to cease the
withholding, the employer shall immediately provide electronic notification to
the labor organization or union of the employee's decision. If the employer
receives the employee's request to cease withholding after payroll for the
current pay period has been submitted or processed, the cessation of
withholding shall take effect as soon as practicable, but no later than the
employee's next paycheck.
(2) Upon receipt of the notification provided for in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the employer shall cease withholding dues or fees from the
employee's wages, and the employee shall not accrue any further debt to the
labor organization or union. The employee's right to immediately discontinue
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 312 ENROLLED
any financial obligation to the labor organization or union shall not be waived.
(3) This Subsection shall apply prospectively to any new collective
bargaining agreement or contract that is entered into or any existing collective
bargaining agreement that is modified, extended, or otherwise affected by a new
or modified memorandum of understanding.
F.(1) The labor organization or union in which the employee has
membership shall notify the employee of his right to cease payment of member
dues or fees, and shall provide electronic notification, at least annually, to the
employee to inform him that he is allowed to withdraw from the organization.
The labor organization or union shall have the burden of proof to establish that
it has met this requirement.
(2) All withholding authorizations shall be on a form prescribed by the
attorney general and contain the following statement in fourteen-point boldface
font:
"The state of Louisiana wishes to inform you that you have a First
Amendment right to join or refrain from joining and paying dues or fees to a
labor organization. Membership and payment of dues or fees are voluntary, and
you may not be discriminated against for your decision or your refusal to join
or financially support a labor organization. You may authorize your employer
to deduct union dues or fees from your salary in the amount specified in
accordance with the labor organization's bylaws. You may revoke this
authorization at any time."
(3) All authorizations shall be submitted to the employer and contain the
employee's full name and signature. Before starting any deductions, the
employer shall confirm the authorization by emailing the employee at his email
address. If the employee does not possess an employer-provided email address,
then the employer may use other means it deems appropriate to confirm the
authorization. The labor organization or union shall be responsible for all
demonstrative administrative costs shown to have been incurred from the
collection of its dues or fees or from an employee's election to discontinue the
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 312 ENROLLED
withholding of any dues or fees.
Section 2. R.S. 42:457 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§457. Union dues
A. Any state, parish, or city employee may authorize his employing
department, board, or agency to withhold from his salary a specific amount for such
pay periods as may be designated, for payment of his dues to any labor organization
to which he belongs and which he designates therein. In such cases, the employee
must shall voluntarily execute and furnish to the employing department, board, or
agency a written and specific authorization for such deductions; however, the
employing authority may elect whether or not to make such deductions. Any amount
withheld in accordance with the provisions of this Section shall be remitted on a
regularly scheduled basis as prescribed by rules promulgated by the Division of
Administration division of administration and administered by the state payroll
office to the organization designated.
B.(1) Upon the submission of an electronic request to the employer, the
employee shall have the right to immediately cease any withholding of dues or
fees from his wages. Upon receipt of a request from the employee to cease the
withholding, the employer shall immediately provide electronic notification to
the labor organization or union of the employee's decision. If the employer
receives the employee's request to cease withholding after payroll for the
current pay period has been submitted or processed, the cessation of
withholding shall take effect as soon as practicable, but no later than the
employee's next paycheck.
(2) Upon receipt of the notification provided for in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the employer shall cease any withholding of dues or fees from the
employee's wages, and the employee shall not accrue any further debt to the
labor organization or union. The employee's right to immediately discontinue
any financial obligation to the labor organization or union shall not be waived.
(3) This Subsection shall apply prospectively to any new collective
bargaining agreement or contract that is entered into or any existing collective
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 312 ENROLLED
bargaining agreement that is modified, extended, or otherwise affected by a new
or modified memorandum of understanding.
C.(1) The labor organization or union in which the employee has
membership shall notify the employee of his right to cease payment of member
organization dues or fees, and shall provide electronic notification, at least
annually, to the employee to inform him that he is allowed to withdraw from the
organization. The labor organization or union shall have the burden of proof to
establish that it has met this requirement.
(2) All withholding authorizations shall be on a form prescribed by the
attorney general containing the following statement in fourteen-point boldface
font:
"The state of Louisiana wishes to inform you that you have a First
Amendment right to join or refrain from joining and paying dues or fees to a
labor organization. Membership and payment of dues or fees are voluntary, and
you may not be discriminated against for your decision or your refusal to join
or financially support a labor organization. You may authorize your employer
to deduct labor organization dues or fees from your salary in the amount
specified in accordance with the labor organization's bylaws. You may revoke
this authorization at any time."
(3)(a) All authorizations shall be submitted to the employer and contain
the employee's full name, position, employee organization, and signature.
(b) The employer shall not deduct any portion of an employee's salary
for purposes of payment of labor organization or union dues or fees without the
employee's authorization. If the employee does not possess an employer-
provided email address, then the employer may use other means it deems
appropriate to confirm the authorization.
(c) The labor organization or union shall be responsible for all
demonstrative administrative costs shown to have been incurred from the
collection of its dues or fees or from an employee's election to discontinue the
withholding of any dues or fees.
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 312 ENROLLED
D.(1) After receiving notice by the United States Department of Labor
that the employer's protective arrangement covering mass transit employees
does not meet the requirements provided for in 49 U.S.C. 5333(b), which would
jeopardize the employer's continued eligibility to receive Federal Transit
Administration funding, an employer may petition the secretary of Louisiana
Works to waive compliance with the requirements provided for in this Section.
(2) To the extent necessary, the secretary of Louisiana Works may waive
any of the requirements provided for in this Section for a labor organization or
union serving as exclusive representative of mass transit employees in order for
an employer to comply with the requirements provided for in 49 U.S.C. 5333(b).
E. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to law enforcement,
mass transit employees, and firefighters.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.